Georgia statutes. 
When claim accrues. - Trial court erred in ruling that a subcontractor's claim against a county accrued on the day the subcontractor received notification about the contractor's cash flow problems when, for three months after the letter was written, the contractor continued to work on the project. Kelly Energy Sys. v. Board of Comm'rs, 196 Ga. App. 519, 396 S.E.2d 498 (1990).

No substitute for presentation. - When the suit was not brought within 12 months after the accrual of the right of action, it cannot be urged as a substitute for or an equivalent of the presentation of a claim. Newsome v. Treutlen County, 168 Ga. 764, 149 S.E. 44 (1929).

Letter to board of commissioners sufficient. - Letter sent to the county board of commissioners by a party, a copy of which was sent to the Department of Transportation, did constitute a presentation of the claim being sued on, since the letter contained sufficient information to afford the recipients thereof an opportunity to investigate the claim and ascertain the evidence prior to suit. Sikes v. Candler County, 247 Ga. 115, 274 S.E.2d 464 (1981).

Statement of damages. - O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 does not create an inflexible requirement that presentation to county of claim must always contain statement of amount of damages in order to be sufficient. Sikes v. Candler County, 247 Ga. 115, 274 S.E.2d 464 (1981).

Letter met ante litem requirements. - Landowners substantially complied with statutory ante litem requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 when the letter the landowners sent to the city alleging damages from a continuing nuisance the city allegedly maintained on the landowners' property and identifying the nature and location of the damage, the cause, and the nature of the potential cause of action, sufficiently put the city on notice of the problem occurring on their property. City of Columbus v. Barngrover, 250 Ga. App. 589, 552 S.E.2d 536 (2001).

Claim need not be presented while governing authority actually in session. - This section does not require that a claim against the county be presented at a time when the governing authority or authorities of the county are actually in session, either at a regular or called meeting, for the transaction of county affairs. Davis v. Cobb County, 65 Ga. App. 533, 15 S.E.2d 814 (1941).

Notice to insurer insufficient. - Formal, written notice to the county is required in presentation of an insurance claim, and notice to the county's liability insurer does not satisfy the statute. Cobb v. Board of Comm'rs of Rds. & Revenue, 151 Ga. App. 472, 260 S.E.2d 496 (1979).

Presentation for auditing. - Charge by the party presenting a claim need not use the word "audit," but it is sufficient if the party presents it for that purpose, and the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) examines it and refuses to allow it, that is, refuses to audit it and approve it but rejects and disallows it, is not erroneous. County of Cobb v. Adams, 68 Ga. 51 (1881).

Procedure

Defense must be set forth affirmatively. - It is incumbent on a party pleading to a preceding pleading to set forth affirmatively any statute of limitation as a defense to an action. Failure to do so results in the court's determination that this issue is not raised, even though it may be present and could operate as a bar to recovery. Nipper v. Crisp County, 120 Ga. App. 583, 171 S.E.2d 652 (1969).

Defense under Ga. L. 1971, p. 180, §§ 6, 9 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1) must be specially pled under Ga. L. 1967, p. 226, § 8 (see now O.C.G.A. § 9-11-8(c)). Gordy Constr. Co. v. KHM Dev. Co., 128 Ga. App. 648, 197 S.E.2d 426 (1973).

In the absence of distinct averments of the presentation of valid claims against the county within the time prescribed by the statute, the petition was subject to demurrer (now motion to dismiss). Commissioners of Rds. & Revenue v. Howard, 59 Ga. App. 541, 1 S.E.2d 222 (1939).

Writing must be alleged. - An allegation that the claim was presented "as provided by law" will not supply the place of a distinct allegation that it was presented in writing. Sparks v. Floyd County, 15 Ga. App. 80, 82 S.E. 583 (1914).

Plaintiff was not dilatory in filing plaintiff's motion to amend to add the county as a new party when the plaintiff filed a negligence suit against a motor company approximately four months after a fatal incident occurred, and moved to add the county for faulty sign-posting approximately two months after filing the original suit. Although O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 did not require plaintiff to wait for a response from the county after plaintiff notified them of plaintiff's claim, plaintiff's two-month delay in adding the county was not dilatory. Jarriel v. GMC, 835 F. Supp. 639 (N.D. Ga. 1993).

Petition subject to dismissal when petition does not show presentation of claim. - When it did not appear in the petition in a suit against a county that the claim sued on was presented to the county within 12 months after the claim accrued or became payable, and when it did not appear that the petition was filed and service thereon perfected upon the county within this period, the petition failed to set out a cause of action, and was subject to dismissal. Griffin Realty & Constr. Co. v. Chatham County, 47 Ga. App. 545, 171 S.E. 237 (1933); Commissioners of Rds. & Revenue v. Howard, 59 Ga. App. 541, 1 S.E.2d 222 (1939).

Sufficiency of averment of presentation. - Statement by plaintiff that plaintiff had in writing demanded compensation from those commissioners, who had refused payment thereof, is sufficient averment of presentation. Adkins v. Crawford County, 135 Ga. 679, 70 S.E. 335 (1911).

Allegation of time. - Allegations that the claim arose "some time during the year 1910," and that the plaintiff's claim for damages was filed on October 14, 1911, are not sufficient to show presentation within 12 months. Elbert County v. Chapman, 15 Ga. App. 197, 82 S.E. 808 (1914).

An action against a county, brought in 1923, to recover taxes alleged to have been illegally levied and collected in 1919, and alleging that a month before the filing of the suit a demand that the taxes so collected be refunded was made upon the county authorities and refused, was barred. Atlantic Coast Line R.R. v. Mitchell County, 36 Ga. App. 47, 135 S.E. 223 (1926).

Time to submit claim. - Claim by a hospital for services rendered to a prisoner injured in a fight in jail was untimely when the prisoner was discharged on December 5, 1996, and a claim was not submitted to the defendant county until December 6, 1997; notwithstanding a hospital policy that bills are not due and payable until 30 days after discharge, the 12 month period began to run at the date of discharge. Board of Regents v. Putnam County, 234 Ga. App. 427, 506 S.E.2d 923 (1998).

In a suit against a county after county workers performed work on private property, it was undisputed that no written ante litem notice was provided to the county of any claim in connection with work performed by the county's workers until August 2003, and by this time, any action either contesting or contrary to the terms of a settlement agreement was barred by the statute of limitations. Meadows v. Houston County, 295 Ga. App. 183, 671 S.E.2d 225 (2008).

Under O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1, all claims against counties must be presented within 12 months after the claims accrue or become payable or the claims are barred, provided that minors or other persons laboring under disabilities shall be allowed 12 months after the removal of the disability to present their claims. Coweta County v. Cooper, 318 Ga. App. 41, 733 S.E.2d 348 (2012).

Trial court did not err by denying a county's motion for summary judgment because an issue of fact existed as to when the parties expected the project to be complete; thus, it followed that there was an issue of fact regarding when, if ever, the county breached the county's agreement to provide water and sewer lines and when the plaintiff's claim of breach of contract accrued and therefore whether the bankruptcy trustee timely filed notice as required by O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1. Effingham County v. Roach, 329 Ga. App. 805, 764 S.E.2d 600 (2014), overruled on other grounds, Rivera v. Washington, 298 Ga. 770, 784 S.E.2d 775 (2016).

Trial court properly granted a county's motion for summary judgment because the record showed that the plaintiffs failed to present notice of the plaintiffs' claim to the county with the 12-month statutory period and admittedly failed to present the county with formal written notice before the plantiffs filed the plaintiffs' suit, which the plaintiffs did not file against the county until more than 22 months after the accident. Warnell v. Unified Gov't of Athens-Clarke County, 328 Ga. App. 903, 763 S.E.2d 284 (2014).

Averment of presentation of note evidencing loan insufficient. - When a plaintiff seeks to recover money loaned to a county and used by the county, an allegation that the plaintiff presented the notes evidencing the loan is not a sufficient averment of presentation. The notes were illegal. This section contemplates present legal action. Butts County v. Wright, 143 Ga. 253, 84 S.E. 443 (1915).

Garnishment not allowed. - System provided by law for the payment of claims against counties is to be adopted in all cases. This system cannot be preserved by allowing counties to be garnished. Dotterer v. Bowe, 84 Ga. 769, 11 S.E. 896 (1890).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Governing authority subject to general law when remitting or crediting county taxes. - Governing authority of the county in exercising the county's authority under former Code 1933, §§ 92-3812 and 92-6502 (see now O.C.G.A. § 48-5-241) was subject to the general law set forth in former Code 1933, § 20-1007 (see now O.C.G.A. § 13-1-13), and was also subject to the limitation prescribed in former Code 1933, § 23-1602 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1). 1958-59 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 379.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 609 et seq.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 390 et seq.

ALR. - Power of city, town, or county or its officials to compromise claim, 105 A.L.R. 170; 15 A.L.R.2d 1359.

Waiver of, or estoppel to assert, defects in notice of claim against county or municipality, 148 A.L.R. 637.

Local government tort liability: minority as affecting notice of claim requirement, 58 A.L.R.4th 402.

Sufficiency of notice of claim against local political entity as regards time when accident occurred, 57 A.L.R.5th 689.

36-11-2. Audit and registration of claims against county; issuance of order on treasurer for claim; specification of fund on which order drawn.

Statute text

Except where otherwise provided by law, each county governing authority shall audit all claims against its respective county. Every such claim, or such part as may be allowed, must be registered. The county governing authority or its clerk must give the claimant an order on the treasurer for the same; in the order, it shall specifically designate upon what particular fund such order is drawn, out of which payment is to be made.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 478; Code 1868, § 540; Ga. L. 1871-2, p. 69, § 1; Code 1873, § 506; Code 1882, § 506; Civil Code 1895, § 361; Civil Code 1910, § 410; Code 1933, § 23-1601.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Application to county commissioners. - When the fiscal affairs of a county are in charge of a board of county commissioners, the authority to audit and settle claims conferred by Ga. L. 1872, p. 479 (see O.C.G.A. §§ 36-5-1 (now repealed) and 36-11-2) upon the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) must be exercised by the board of county commissioners. Walker v. Stephens, 175 Ga. 405, 165 S.E. 99 (1932).

The statute applies to county commissioners when commissioners, instead of the ordinary (now judge of the probate court), have control of county affairs. Walden v. Smith, 203 Ga. 207, 45 S.E.2d 660 (1947).

Duty nondelegable. - Duty of the board of county commissioners to audit and pass upon any claims arising against the county in connection with a construction project is a duty which cannot be delegated, and the funds in controversy should not be used for the payment of any such charges before a determination of their correctness by such commissioners. McGinty v. Pickering, 180 Ga. 447, 179 S.E. 358 (1935).

Presumption that order or warrant valid. - It will be presumed that an order or warrant of the commissioners is a valid judgment, unless it shows that the commissioners had no jurisdiction to issue the order or warrant. Blue Island State Bank v. McRae, 169 Ga. 279, 150 S.E. 151 (1929).

Cited in Armistead v. MacNeill, 203 Ga. 204, 45 S.E.2d 652 (1947); DeKalb County v. Bolick, 249 Ga. 843, 295 S.E.2d 92 (1982).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 722.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 395.

ALR. - Waiver of, or estoppel to assert, defects in notice of claim against county or municipality, 148 A.L.R. 637.

36-11-3. When orders to be paid; registration of orders issued.

Statute text

No order shall be paid until after five days from its date and delivery, unless otherwise specially ordered. In the meantime, the county governing authority may furnish the county treasurer with a full statement of all orders issued, which shall be immediately registered by him; when so registered, such orders shall be paid according to law, without further notice to the treasurer previous to the time of payment.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 531; Code 1868, § 595; Code 1873, § 557; Code 1882, § 557; Civil Code 1895, § 464; Civil Code 1910, § 580; Code 1933, § 23-1605.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Sections 7-4-2 and 7-4-15 not repealed and construed in pari materia. - Former Code 1933, § 23-1604 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-3 et seq.) did not expressly or by necessary implication repeal former Code 1933, §§ 57-101 and 57-110 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 7-4-2 and 7-4-15). The statutes all were to be considered together, and when so considered, the sections first mentioned contemplate administrative action by the county officers in regard to the order in which lawful county orders shall be paid. Marion County v. First Nat'l Bank, 193 Ga. 263, 18 S.E.2d 475 (1942).

Failure to register a warrant drawn by the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) of a county may subordinate the payment of the warrant to that of others duly registered, but it does not render the warrant void. Neal Loan & Banking Co. v. Chastain, 121 Ga. 500, 49 S.E. 618 (1904).

Mandamus to compel furnishing of statement. - Mandamus issued requiring by virtue of this section the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) to furnish a statement of all orders drawn by a predecessor in office on funds derived from the sale of courthouse bonds. Aaron v. German, 114 Ga. 587, 40 S.E. 713 (1901).

Interest. - County warrant, which is a liquidated demand, even though the warrant does not express any date for payment, is as a matter of law payable on demand, when made five days after the date on which the warrant is issued, and will ordinarily bear interest from and after demand was so made. Marion County v. First Nat'l Bank, 193 Ga. 263, 18 S.E.2d 475 (1942).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 400.

36-11-4. Order in which county debts paid.

Statute text

(a) When there are enough funds to pay all outstanding orders and other forms of indebtedness due which the treasurer is authorized to pay, such debts may be paid indiscriminately without regard to their dates. When there are enough funds to pay all forms of indebtedness dated prior to some particular date, all such forms of indebtedness may likewise be paid indiscriminately. When there are insufficient funds to pay all forms of indebtedness of equal degree, they shall be paid ratably. Under all other circumstances, debts should be paid in the order of their dates.

(b) If any person holding county orders fails to present them by December 1 to the county treasurer for payment, such orders shall be postponed in favor of all orders which were so presented and were not paid for want of funds.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, §§ 530, 532; Code 1868, §§ 594, 596; Code 1873, §§ 556, 558; Code 1882, §§ 556, 558; Civil Code 1895, §§ 463, 465; Civil Code 1910, §§ 579, 581; Code 1933, §§ 23-1604, 23-1607.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Sections 7-4-2 and 7-4-15 not repealed and construed in pari materia. - Former Code 1933, § 23-1604 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-3 et seq.) did not expressly or by necessary implication repeal former Code 1933, §§ 57-101 and 57-110 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 7-4-2 and 7-4-15). The statutes were to be considered together, and when so considered, the sections first mentioned contemplate administrative action by the county officers in regard to the order in which lawful county orders shall be paid. Marion County v. First Nat'l Bank, 193 Ga. 263, 18 S.E.2d 475 (1942).

Compliance with section. - Former Code 1933, § 23-1306 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-6) was substantially complied with by an endorsement upon the order by a designated county officer as follows: "presented for payment" on a named date - "insf. funds," meaning insufficient funds; and this was true notwithstanding it was provided by former Code 1933, §§ 23-1604 and 23-1607 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-4) "when there is not enough to pay all [county orders] of equal degree, they shall be paid ratably." Candler v. W.A. Neal & Son, 46 Ga. App. 625, 168 S.E. 265 (1933), aff'd, 180 Ga. 89, 178 S.E. 285 (1935).

Applicability of section when warrants aggregate sum larger than treasury. - When warrants for current expenses, which have been paid by another from the proceeds of a loan which the other person made to the county (to the rights of the several holders of which warrants such person has become subrogated), and other warrants issued by the county commissioners, aggregate a sum larger than that which the county has in the county's treasury, raised from the revenues of the year in which the various liabilities were incurred, payment must be made in accordance with the rules prescribed in former Civil Code 1895, §§ 361 et seq. and 463 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-2 et seq.). Butts County v. Jackson Banking Co., 129 Ga. 801, 60 S.E. 149 (1907).

Cited in Maddox v. Anchor Duck Mills, 167 Ga. 695, 146 S.E. 551 (1929).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 722.

36-11-5. Interest on orders presented and not paid.

Statute text

(a) On December 1 of each year, the county treasurer and the county governing authority shall together make an entry of all orders entitled to payment which were not so presented for payment and what orders not of equal dignity have been paid instead, in whole or in part, and what other orders are entitled to payment before such nonpresented orders. Persons holding such orders who present them without receiving payment before such day may have the treasurer annually mark thereon "Presented," the day of presentation, and that they were not paid for want of funds. Such county orders, when legally issued and duly presented, as provided in this Code section, and not paid for want of funds, shall bear interest at such rate as may be prescribed by the county governing authority, by resolution duly adopted and entered upon the minutes of the county governing authority, which rate of interest shall in no event be more than 7 percent per annum from date of entry of presentation and nonpayment for want of funds. The rate so fixed shall be plainly written or printed upon the face of the order. However, interest shall not be paid on such warrant or warrants after July 1 following the year in which they were presented unless the warrant or warrants are again presented and payment is refused for want of funds. The treasurer or keeper of county funds shall endorse on the warrant the words "Presented for payment; no funds on hand with which to pay same. This the ________ day of ________________________, ______."

(b) Any county order issued by any county governing authority shall bear interest at the rate specified by resolution at the time of the issuance of the order, as provided in this Code section. The rate of interest which the warrant shall thereafter bear shall not be changed or affected by any subsequent resolution or change of rate of interest that may be adopted thereafter by the county governing authority; rather the warrant shall bear the rate of interest written or printed upon the face of the order and established by the county governing authority at the time of the issuance thereof.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 533; Code 1868, § 597; Code 1873, § 508; Code 1882, § 508; Civil Code 1895, § 466; Civil Code 1910, § 582; Ga. L. 1920, p. 65, § 1; Code 1933, § 23-1608; Ga. L. 1935, p. 110, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Sections 7-4-2 and 7-4-15 not repealed and construed in pari materia. - Former Code 1933, § 23-1604 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-3 et seq.) did not expressly or by necessary implication repeal former Code 1933, §§ 57-101 and 57-110 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 7-4-2 and 7-4-15). The statutes all were to be considered together, and when so considered, the sections first mentioned contemplate administrative action by the county officers in regard to the order in which lawful county orders shall be paid. Marion County v. First Nat'l Bank, 193 Ga. 263, 18 S.E.2d 475 (1942).

Compliance with section. - Former Code 1933, § 23-1608 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-5) was substantially complied with by an endorsement upon the order by a designated county officer as follows: "presented for payment" on a named date - "insf. funds," meaning insufficient funds; and this was true notwithstanding it was provided by former Code 1933, §§ 23-1604 and 23-1607 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-4), "when there is not enough to pay all [county orders] of equal degree, they shall be paid ratably." Candler v. W.A. Neal & Son, 46 Ga. App. 625, 168 S.E. 265 (1933), aff'd, 180 Ga. 89, 178 S.E. 285 (1935).

When interest begins. - County warrants do not bear interest, unless the warrants are presented for payment and payment is not made for want of funds, and an entry of such presentation and such nonpayment is made by the county treasurer on the warrant, with the date of presentation. When the above requirements are complied with, such warrants bear interest from the date of entry of such presentation and nonpayment until the first day of July of the year following in which such entry is made. Americus Grocery Co. v. Pitts Banking Co., 169 Ga. 70, 149 S.E. 776 (1929).

Former Code 1933, § 23-1608 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-5) assumed that the county treasurer would pay the warrant when payment was demanded, and if the treasurer failed to pay, contemplated that interest would run in virtue of former Code 1933, §§ 57-101 and 57-110 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 7-4-2 and 7-4-15) from the date of the demand. Marion County v. First Nat'l Bank, 193 Ga. 263, 18 S.E.2d 475 (1942).

Interest if funds available. - Provision in former Code 1933, § 23-1608 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-5) that county orders when legally issued and duly presented as therein provided "and not paid for want of funds, shall bear interest" if endorsed by the treasurer as set forth, did not mean that interest allowed generally on liquidated demands as under former Code 1933, §§ 57-101 and 57-110 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 7-4-2 and 7-4-15), would be disallowed if sufficient available funds were in hand to pay the warrant. Marion County v. First Nat'l Bank, 193 Ga. 263, 18 S.E.2d 475 (1942).

Recovery of full value of instrument. - In a suit by the endorsee against the endorser to recover upon the contract of endorsement, the plaintiff is entitled to recover the full face value of the order with any interest legally due thereon as provided in this section. Candler v. W.A. Neal & Son, 46 Ga. App. 625, 168 S.E. 265 (1933), aff'd, 180 Ga. 89, 178 S.E. 285 (1935).

Treasurer cannot go behind judgment. - Order drawn by the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) of a county on the treasurer for the payment of a debt due by the county is evidence of an adjudication by the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) that the amount stated in the order is due; and the treasurer cannot go behind this judgment, except for fraud or mistake as to the amount of the indebtedness. Thompson v. Shurling, 184 Ga. 836, 193 S.E. 880 (1937).

Duty of treasurer when payment refused. - An official duty of a county treasurer, to whom a regularly issued warrant drawn by the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) having control of the finances of the county is presented for payment, when payment is refused, is to make the entry on the warrant prescribed by the statute. Thompson v. Shurling, 184 Ga. 836, 193 S.E. 880 (1937).

Orders drawn upon nonexistent funds. - This section clearly contemplates the existence of county orders drawn upon funds not in esse, and the warrants are not for that reason illegal. Walker v. Stephens, 175 Ga. 405, 165 S.E. 99 (1932).

Mandamus. - Court did not err in granting mandamus absolute requiring county treasurer to make entry on a county warrant issued by the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) in favor of petitioner indicating that the warrant was prevented and not paid for by lack of funds. Thompson v. Shurling, 184 Ga. 836, 193 S.E. 880 (1937).

Cited in Hartley v. Nash, 157 Ga. 402, 121 S.E. 295 (1924).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 405.

36-11-6. Negotiability of county orders.

Statute text

All county orders are transferable by delivery or endorsement; and the endorser shall be liable according to the terms of his endorsement, as in commercial paper, provided that no transfer can take place so as to prevent a treasurer from setting off any sum that the payee may owe the county at the date of the order.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 534; Code 1868, § 598; Code 1873, § 560; Code 1882, § 560; Civil Code 1895, § 467; Civil Code 1910, § 583; Code 1933, § 23-1606.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Sections 7-4-2 and 7-4-15 not repealed and construed in pari materia. - Former Code 1933, § 23-1604 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-3 et seq.) did not expressly or by necessary implication repeal former Code 1933, §§ 57-101 and 57-110 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 7-4-2 and 7-4-15). The statutes all were to be considered together, and when so considered, the sections first mentioned contemplate administrative action by the county officers in regard to the order in which lawful county orders shall be paid. Marion County v. First Nat'l Bank, 193 Ga. 263, 18 S.E.2d 475 (1942).

Effect of endorsement. - Payee may have authorized the delivery of a warrant to the payee's son-in-law only for the purpose of safekeeping, yet, if at that time the warrant bore the payee's genuine signature as an endorsement thereon, the payee thereby gave to the depositary such external indicia of the right of disposing of the warrant that the depositary could, by pledging the same to an innocent person for a present consideration, divest the payee's title. Lilly v. Citizens' Bank & Trust Co., 44 Ga. App. 653, 162 S.E. 639 (1932).

Discounting of warrants. - Inasmuch as the law authorizes a sale of county warrants and provides the method by which the vendor shall be liable to the vendee, and how the county shall be liable for interest, there is nothing illegal in the arrangement which was made between the county and the banks in discounting the legal warrants issued by the county. Southern Ry. v. Fulton County, 170 Ga. 248, 152 S.E. 567 (1930).

An order or warrant is prima-facie evidence of indebtedness on the part of the county to the payee, transferee, or endorsee, of the validity of the claim for which the warrant is issued, and the burden of proving the warrant invalid is upon the commissioners or the ordinary (now judge of the probate court), as the case may be. Blue Island State Bank v. McRae, 169 Ga. 279, 150 S.E. 151 (1929).

Subrogation of rights of maker of illegal loan to rights of warrant holder. - When a county incurs a lawful liability for a current expense, and issues a warrant on the treasury for the warrant's payment, and subsequently procures another to pay the warrant out of a loan which the other person makes to the county, upon disaffirmance of the illegal loan by the county the lender is subrogated to the rights of the warrant holder whose warrant was paid out of the proceeds of the illegal loan. Butts County v. Jackson Banking Co., 129 Ga. 801, 60 S.E. 149 (1907).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 10 C.J.S., Bills and Notes, §§ 127, 129.

36-11-7. Satisfaction of judgment against county.

Statute text

The private property of the citizens of a county shall not be bound by any judgment obtained against the county. Such judgment, if binding, shall be satisfied from money raised by lawful taxation.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 480; Code 1868, § 542; Code 1873, § 508; Code 1882, § 508; Civil Code 1895, § 363; Civil Code 1910, § 412; Code 1933, § 23-1603.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Appropriation of moneys for liability policy premiums and for damages exceeding policy limits. - Board of commissioners must appropriate moneys for insurance premiums on any policy which might pay a plaintiff if plaintiff's suit is ultimately successful in plaintiff's claim against the county or must appropriate moneys to pay actual damages should plaintiff's recovery exceed the policy limits. Dodson v. Floyd, 529 F. Supp. 1056 (N.D. Ga. 1981).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 419, 420.

ALR. - County as subject to garnishment process, 60 A.L.R. 823.

——————————

CHAPTER 12

SUPERVISION AND SUPPORT OF PAUPERS

Sec.

36-12-1. General supervision of paupers.

36-12-2. Eligibility for benefits.

36-12-3. Duty of relatives to support paupers generally; right of county to recover from relatives for provisions furnished.

36-12-4. Liability of person sending pauper to county for support purposes.

36-12-5. Interment or cremation of deceased indigents.

Annotations

Cross references. - Provision of hospital care for the indigent generally, § 31-8-1.

Establishment of county departments of family and children's services, § 49-3-1.

36-12-1. General supervision of paupers.

Statute text

The general supervision of all paupers is vested in the county governing authority.

History

(Laws 1792, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 346; Laws 1818, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 347; Code 1863, § 710; Code 1868, § 776; Code 1873, § 754; Code 1882, § 754; Civil Code 1895, § 426; Civil Code 1910, § 541; Code 1933, § 23-2101.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Inquiry as to chargeability. - Until there has been some inquiry into the circumstances of the poor who will be treated as paupers and who shall become chargeable to the county, no persons can be properly said to be so chargeable. Justices of Inferior Court v. Chapman, 16 Ga. 89 (1854).

Confederate soldiers, referred to in the expression "indigent pensioners," as used in Ga. L. 1909, p. 17, § 2, cannot be classed as paupers. Clark v. Walton, 137 Ga. 277, 73 S.E. 392 (1911).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Presumption and burden of proof of settlement in action by one town or poor district against another for support of pauper, 99 A.L.R. 457.

Tort liability of municipality or other governmental subdivision in connection with poor relief activities, 134 A.L.R. 762.

36-12-2. Eligibility for benefits.

Statute text

No person who is able to maintain himself by labor or who has sufficient means shall be entitled to the benefits of the provision for the poor. In cases where women are unable to maintain themselves and the helpless children they may have, they may be aided to the extent required in the furnishing of food, clothing, or shelter.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 715; Code 1868, § 785; Code 1873, § 763; Code 1882, § 763; Civil Code 1895, § 438; Civil Code 1910, § 553; Code 1933, § 23-2301.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Levy valid even if Act unconstitutional. - An item of a county tax levy for the "support of paupers," as provided under the Constitution, will not be enjoined on the ground that it is null and void, even if, as alleged, the moneys are to be expended as provided under an unconstitutional Act, unless it also appears that the levy itself is for some reason invalid. If the Act is invalid, the tax must nevertheless be levied. J.G. McCrory Co. v. Board of Comm'rs of Rds. & Revenues, 177 Ga. 242, 170 S.E. 18 (1933) (decided under former Civil Code 1910, §§ 550 and 553.)

36-12-3. Duty of relatives to support paupers generally; right of county to recover from relatives for provisions furnished.

Statute text

The father, mother, or child of any pauper contemplated by Code Section 36-12-2, if sufficiently able, shall support the pauper. Any county having provided for such pauper upon the failure of such relatives to do so may bring an action against such relatives of full age and recover for the provisions so furnished. The certificate of the judge of the probate court that the person was poor and was unable to sustain himself and that he was maintained at the expense of the county shall be presumptive evidence of such maintenance and the costs thereof.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, §§ 716, 717; Code 1868, §§ 786, 787; Code 1873, §§ 764, 765; Code 1882, §§ 764, 765; Civil Code 1895, §§ 439, 440; Civil Code 1910, §§ 554, 555; Code 1933, §§ 23-2302, 23-2303.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Duty of parents to support child, § 19-7-2.

Child Support Recovery Act, § 19-11-1 et seq.

Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act, § 19-11-40 et seq.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Considering former Code 1933, §§ 23-2302 and 23-2303 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-12-3) in connection with cognate sections, the words "any pauper contemplated by former Code 1933, § 23-2301 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-12-2)," refer to one who is completely destitute. Citizens & S. Nat'l Bank v. Cook, 182 Ga. 240, 185 S.E. 318 (1936).

When mother must support children. - On the death of a father the duty of supporting the children devolves upon the mother, when the mother has the ability, and the infant child is without means, and is unable to earn a maintenance. Thompson v. Georgia Ry. & Power Co., 163 Ga. 598, 136 S.E. 895 (1927).

Child must be destitute. - Child has no right to recover unless the child is completely destitute. Crane v. Crane, 225 Ga. 605, 170 S.E.2d 392 (1969).

Mother's right of support from child. - Destitute mother being a pauper within the meaning of this section and having a son of sufficient ability to support her, has a right to such support from the son, and when the destitute mother has the right to support from her son, a court of equity may provide a remedy to enforce the right. Citizens & S. Nat'l Bank v. Cook, 182 Ga. 240, 185 S.E. 318 (1936).

Wrongful birth damages. - In action for damages under federal wrongful birth claim, extraordinary expenses of the child's care are recoverable beyond the child's eighteenth birthday if the child will be completely destitute as Georgia law imposes the duty to support on parents of a destitute adult. Campbell v. United States, 795 F. Supp. 1118 (N.D. Ga. 1990), aff'd, 962 F.2d 1579 (11th Cir. 1992), cert. denied, 507 U.S. 909, 113 S. Ct. 1254, 122 L. Ed. 2d 653 (1993).

Confederate soldiers, referred to in the expression "indigent pensioners," as used in Ga. L. 1909, p. 173, § 2, cannot be classed as paupers. Clark v. Walton, 137 Ga. 277, 73 S.E. 392 (1911).

Jurisdiction of petition for wife's support. - If a petition by a wife for support from her husband is considered as an action for alimony against the defendant husband, the petition must be brought in the county of his residence, and a court would be without jurisdiction of the cause in another county. Davenport v. Davenport, 215 Ga. 496, 111 S.E.2d 57 (1959).

Cited in Owens v. Parham, 350 F. Supp. 598 (N.D. Ga. 1972); Still v. Still, 199 Ga. App. 723, 405 S.E.2d 762 (1991).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 79 Am. Jur. 2d, Welfare Laws, §§ 80 et seq., 89 et seq.

C.J.S. - 41 C.J.S., Husband and Wife, §§ 16, 66 et seq. 67A C.J.S., Parent and Child, §§ 44, 45.

ALR. - Liability of parent for dental services to minor child, 7 A.L.R. 1070.

Criminal liability of father for failure to support child who is living apart from him without his consent, 23 A.L.R. 864.

Survival of statutory liability for support of relative, 96 A.L.R. 537.

Nature of care contemplated by statute imposing general duty to care for indigent relatives, 92 A.L.R.2d 348.

Constitutionality of statutory provision requiring reimbursement of public by child for financial assistance to aged parents, 75 A.L.R.3d 1159.

36-12-4. Liability of person sending pauper to county for support purposes.

Statute text

Any inhabitant of any county, city, town, or village in or out of this state who sends a pauper to some county in this state by paying the expense of his transportation or otherwise has him removed for the purpose of burdening some other community shall be personally liable for the support of the pauper in the county where he locates. If the person who transports a pauper is insolvent or does not respond to such demand from any cause, the county from which the transportation took place shall be liable.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, §§ 718, 719; Code 1868, §§ 789, 790; Code 1873, §§ 767, 768; Code 1882, §§ 767, 768; Civil Code 1895, §§ 442, 443; Civil Code 1910, §§ 557, 558; Code 1933, §§ 23-2305, 23-2306.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 79 Am. Jur. 2d, Welfare Laws, § 86.

36-12-5. Interment or cremation of deceased indigents.

Statute text

(a) Whenever any person dies in this state and the decedent, his or her family, and his or her immediate kindred are indigent and unable to provide for the decedent's decent interment or cremation, the governing authority of the county wherein the death occurs shall make available from county funds a sum sufficient to provide a decent interment or cremation of the deceased indigent person or to reimburse such person as may have expended the cost thereof voluntarily, the exact amount thereof to be determined by the governing authority of the county but shall not exceed the lesser of the actual costs of interment or cremation.

(b) The Department of Corrections is authorized to reimburse the governing authority of the county where expenditures have been made in accordance with this Code section for the burial or cremation of any inmate under the authority, jurisdiction, or control of the Department of Corrections; but in no case shall the governing authority of the county be entitled to reimbursement where the decedent was in the custody of a county correctional institution or other county correctional facility.

History

(Ga. L. 1863-64, p. 60, § 1; Code 1868, § 788; Code 1873, § 766; Code 1882, § 766; Civil Code 1895, § 441; Civil Code 1910, § 556; Code 1933, § 23-2304; Ga. L. 1967, p. 616, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 971, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 616, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1048, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 722, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 34; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1985, p. 265, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 431, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2013, p. 669, § 1/SB 83.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Embalming, transportation, and care of bodies generally, T. 31, C. 21.

Notifying of commissioner of corrections and county coroner upon sudden death of inmate or death of inmate under unusual circumstances, § 42-5-7.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS
